Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2041.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 44-5 of the General Laws entitled "Levy and Assessment of Local
Taxes" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-5-79.1. Little Compton -- Homestead exemption.
(a) The town council, upon approval by the financial town meeting, is authorized to
annually fix the amount of a homestead exemption with respect to the assessed value from local
taxation on taxable real property used for residential purposes in the town of Little Compton and
to grant homestead exemptions to the owner(s) of those residential dwellings in percentage amounts
as follows:
(1) In the first year the exemption will be ten percent (10%) of the mean assessed value of
all taxable real properties in the town of Little Compton.
(2) In each subsequent fiscal year, the financial town meeting may, by majority vote, amend
the percentage described in subsection (a)(1) of this section, within a range of not less than five
percent (5%) or more than fifteen percent (15%) of the mean assessed value of all taxable real
properties in the town of Little Compton.
(b) All residents who own the residential dwelling in which they reside and are registered
to vote in the town of Little Compton shall automatically qualify for the homestead exemption and
shall not be required to file an application for the homestead exemption.
(c) Non-registered voters who are residents of the town of Little Compton and who own
the residential dwelling in which they reside may apply for the homestead exemption on forms

supplied by the Little Compton tax assessor and by demonstrating residency in Little Compton with
a Rhode Island driver’s license or other official identification and a utility bill showing the name
and address of the resident.
(d) Residents of Little Compton who own more than one residential dwelling located in
Little Compton may also apply for a homestead exemption on a second residential dwelling using
the process set forth in subsections (b) and (c) of this section.
(e) A residential dwelling leased for at least twelve (12) months to a full-time resident may
also be eligible for a homestead exemption so long as the rental payments remain at the same
amount at the start of the next twelve (12) month lease cycle following the approval of the
exemption. The Little Compton tax assessor shall supply application forms for rental property
homestead exemptions, to be filed along with the lease agreement, and additional identifying
information for the tenant(s) as determined by the tax assessor.
(f) For the purposes of this section, the term "resident" means an individual whose principal
place of residence is located within the town of Little Compton and who occupies such dwelling
for more than six (6) months of the calendar year.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003740
========
LC003740 - Page 2 of 3